Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 35 Southern Dairy Compact
43-35-104. Effective date of compact.

This compact shall become effective when all of the following have occurred:

When the governor has executed the compact on behalf of this state and has caused a verified copy of the compact to be filed with the secretary of state;

When the commissioner of agriculture has certified to the governor and to the general assembly that two (2) or more of the other states named in § 43-35-101 article VII, section 20 have ratified the compact in a form substantially similar to this enactment; and

When the consent of congress has been obtained.

The governor is authorized and directed to take such action as may be necessary to complete the exchange of official documents between this state and any other state ratifying this compact.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 5.

43-35-105. Compact administrator.

The compact administrator for this state shall be the commissioner of agriculture. The duties of the compact administrator shall be deemed a regular part of the duties of the commissioner's office and the commissioner's expenses as compact administrator become a charge upon the funds of the department of agriculture.

The commissioner, as compact administrator, shall be vested with all powers provided for in the compact and all the powers necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 6.

43-35-106. Acquisition of information pertaining to the dairy industry.

The commissioner of agriculture may, by lawful means, obtain information pertaining to the dairy industry that the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this part and the southern dairy compact. Such information may be utilized by the commissioner, the delegates, and the commission.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 7.

43-35-107. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled at title 4, chapter 5, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this part and the southern dairy compact.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 8.

43-35-108. Copies of commission bylaws.

Pursuant to article VI, section 5, copies of the commission's bylaws and amendments thereto shall be filed with the commissioner of agriculture.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 9.

43-35-109. State cooperation with compact commission.

Consistent with law and within available appropriations, the departments, agencies and officers of this state shall cooperate with the southern dairy compact commission established by § 43-35-101, article II, section 4.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 10.

43-35-110. Obligations in excess of appropriations—Unlawful.

It is unlawful for the compact administrator or the commissioner's representative, and/or the members of the commission representing the state of Tennessee, to make any agreement, to create any obligation, or to commit the state for any funds, moneys or property in excess of the amounts on hand and/or the amount of appropriation for the biennium. Any such agreement, obligation or commitment shall be null and void. Such agreements, obligations or commitments shall be approved by the attorney general and reporter prior to their execution by the proper officials of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1998, ch. 749, § 11.